Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1456
Jurisdiction and service of process.

The district or county court of this state may exercise jurisdiction over any landlord or tenant with respect to any conduct in this state governed by the Mobile Home Landlord and Tenant Act or with respect to any claim arising from a transaction subject to the act for a dwelling unit located within its jurisdictional boundaries. Service outside this state may be made in the manner provided in section 25-540.

Laws 1984, LB 916, § 7;

Laws 1986, LB 750, § 4.